Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1652.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-735, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-735. Overtaking bicycles; civil penalties A. When overtaking and passing a bicycle proceeding in the same direction, a person driving a motor vehicle shall exercise due care by leaving a safe distance between the motor vehicle and the bicycle of not less than three feet until the motor vehicle is safely past the overtaken bicycle. B. If a person violates this section and the violation results in a collision causing: 1. Serious physical injury as defined in section 13-105 to another person, the violator is subject to a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars. 2. Death to another person, the violator is subject to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars. C. Subsection B of this section does not apply to if a bicyclist who is injured in a vehicular traffic lane when a designated bicycle lane or path is present and passable.END_STATUTE